Utah statutes.
53-2-508.   Reimbursement -- Resolving reimbursement disputes.

(1) (a)  Each requesting political subdivision shall reimburse each responding political subdivision providing assistance to the requesting political subdivision for any loss or damage suffered or expense or cost incurred by a responding political subdivision in the operation of equipment or in providing a service in response to a request under Section 53-2-507.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a responding political subdivision may, in its discretion:

(i)  assume some or all of the loss, damage, expense, or cost; or

(ii)  loan equipment or donate services to the requesting political subdivision without charge.

(2) (a)  A responding political subdivision may request reimbursement from a requesting political subdivision for the costs of providing disaster relief assistance.

(b)  Each request for reimbursement shall comply with the procedures and criteria developed by the committee.

(3)  If a dispute concerning reimbursement arises between a requesting political subdivision and a responding political subdivision:

(a)  the requesting political subdivision and responding political subdivision shall make every effort to resolve the dispute within 30 days after either provides written notice to the other of the other's noncompliance with applicable procedures or criteria; and

(b)  if the dispute is not resolved within 90 days after the notice under Subsection (3)(a), either party may submit the dispute to the committee, whose decision shall be final.

